District of Columbia statutes.
6-502

Review of subdivision and other new development proposals.

The Mayor shall review subdivision proposals and other proposed new developments to assure that:

(1)

All such proposals are consistent with the need to minimize flood damage;

(2)

All public utilities and facilities, such as sewer, gas, electrical, and water systems are located, elevated, and constructed to minimize or eliminate flood damage; and

(3)

Adequate drainage is provided so as to reduce exposure to flood hazards.

History

May 26, 1976, D.C. Law 1-64, § 3, 22 DCR 7146

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-302.
1973 Ed., § 5-1102.